Georgia, session 2025_26, SB14.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to primaries and
elections generally, is amended by revising paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (c) of Code
Section 21-2-132, relating to filing notice of candidacy, nomination petition, and affidavit,
reopening qualifying period, payment of qualifying fee, and pauper's affidavit and qualifying
petition for exemption from qualifying fee, as follows:
"(1) Each candidate for the office of district attorney when a local Act has been enacted
for the filling of such office in a nonpartisan election and each candidate for the office of
judge of the superior court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, or Justice of the Supreme
Court, or the candidate's agent, desiring to have his or her name placed on the nonpartisan
S. B. 14
- 1 -

LC 47 3127
election ballot shall file a notice of candidacy, giving his or her name, residence address,
and the office sought, in the office of the Secretary of State no earlier than 9:00 A.M. on
the Monday of the eleventh week immediately prior to the election and no later
than 12:00 Noon on the Friday immediately following such Monday, notwithstanding the
fact that any such days may be legal holidays;
(2) Each candidate for solicitor-general of a state court, a county judicial office, a local
board of education office, or an office of a consolidated government, or the candidate's
agent, desiring to have his or her name placed on the nonpartisan election ballot shall file
notice of candidacy in the office of the superintendent no earlier than 9:00 A.M. on the
Monday of the eleventh week immediately prior to the election and no later than 12:00
Noon on the Friday immediately following such Monday, notwithstanding the fact that
any such days may be legal holidays;"
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended by revising subsection (a) of Code Section 21-2-139, relating
to nonpartisan elections authorized and conduct, as follows:
"(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, the General
Assembly may provide by local Act for the election in nonpartisan elections of candidates
to fill the office of district attorney, the office of solicitor-general of the state court, county
judicial offices, offices of local boards of education, and offices of consolidated
governments which are filled by the vote of the electors of said such judicial circuit,
county, or political subdivision. Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, the
procedures to be employed in such nonpartisan elections shall conform as nearly as
practicable to the procedures governing nonpartisan elections as provided in this chapter.
Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, the election procedures established by
any existing local law which provides for the nonpartisan election of candidates to fill
county offices shall conform to the general procedures governing nonpartisan elections as
S. B. 14
- 2 -

LC 47 3127
provided in this chapter, and such nonpartisan elections shall be conducted in accordance
with the applicable provisions of this chapter, notwithstanding the provisions of any
existing local law. For those offices for which the General Assembly, pursuant to this
Code section, provided by local Act for election in nonpartisan primaries and elections,
such offices shall no longer require nonpartisan primaries. Such officers shall be elected
in nonpartisan elections held and conducted in conjunction with the general primary in
even-numbered years in accordance with this chapter without a prior nonpartisan primary.
This Code section shall apply to all nonpartisan elections for members of consolidated
governments. All nonpartisan elections for members of consolidated governments shall
be governed by the provisions of this Code section and shall be considered county elections
and not municipal elections for the purposes of this Code section. Nonpartisan elections
for municipal offices shall be conducted on the dates provided in the municipal charter."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 14
- 3 -